Utah statutes.
67-10-1.   Reports of expenditures of appropriations -- Exceptions.

Excepting the governor and the state auditor, all state officers, state boards and commissions, and the officers of all state institutions, to whom and for which appropriations are made, shall submit to the Division of Archives a detailed statement, under oath, of the manner in which all appropriations for their respective departments and institutions have been expended.



Amended by Chapter 67, 1984 General Session

